Utah statutes.
62A-16-102.   Definitions.
(1)  "Committee" means a fatality review committee, formed under Section
62A-16-202 or 62A-16-203.
(2)  "Qualified individual" means an individual who:
(a)  at the time that the individual dies, is a resident of a facility or
program that is owned or operated by the department or a division of the
department;
(b) (i)  is in the custody of the department or a division of the department;
and
(ii)  is placed in a residential placement by the department or a division of
the department;
(c)  at the time that the individual dies, has an open case for the receipt of
child welfare services, including:
(i)  an investigation for abuse, neglect, or dependency;
(ii)  foster care;
(iii)  in-home services; or
(iv)  substitute care;
(d)  had an open case for the receipt of child welfare services within one
year immediately preceding the day on which the individual dies;
(e)  was the subject of an accepted referral received by Adult Protective
Services within one year immediately preceding the day on which the individual
dies, if:
(i)  the department or a division of the department is aware of the death; and
(ii)  the death is reported as a homicide, suicide, or an undetermined cause;
(f)  received services from, or under the direction of, the Division of
Services for People with Disabilities within one year immediately preceding
the day on which the individual dies, unless the individual:
(i)  lived in the individual's home at the time of death; and
(ii)  the director of the Office of Services Review determines that the death
was not in any way related to services that were provided by, or under the
direction of, the department or a division of the department;
(g)  dies within 60 days after the day on which the individual is discharged
from the Utah State Hospital, if the department is aware of the death; or
(h)  is designated as a qualified individual by the executive director.
